New York, session 2025-2026, A2647.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The highway law is amended by adding a new section 344-r to 2 read as follows: 3 § 344-r. Portion of the state highway system to be dedicated to War 4 Dogs. All that portion of the state highway system constituting state 5 route 28 in the village of Herkimer, county of Herkimer, beginning at 6 its intersection with Canal Access Road, continuing in a generally 7 northerly direction, and terminating at its intersection with state 8 route 5, shall be dedicated to War Dogs. 9 § 2. The commissioner of transportation shall provide for the instal- 10 lation and maintenance of adequate signing of the state highway system 11 as dedicated pursuant to section one of this act, provided that such 12 signing shall state "Bridge Dedicated to War Dogs". However, to avoid 13 confusion and to limit any possible disruption of commerce, the dedi- 14 cation called for pursuant to section one of this act shall be one of 15 ceremonial nature and the official name of such highway shall not be 16 changed as a result of this act. 17 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00099-04-5